Hawaii statutes.
§486-53 Violations; penalties. Any
person who commits any of the prohibited acts or omits any of the prescribed
acts, herein required or required in any rule adopted by the board shall be
subject to the penalties provided in section 486-32. Each day that a violation
exists, or is continued, or continues to exist, shall be construed as a
separate punishable offense. [L 1988, c 156, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next